North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-12.2 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act
14-12.2-45. (611)
Modification of child support order of another state.

If section 14-12.2-46.1 does not apply, upon petition a tribunal of this state may modify a child support order issued in another state which is registered in this state if, after notice and hearing, the tribunal finds that:

The following requirements are met:

Neither the child, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

A petitioner who is a nonresident of this state seeks modification; and

The respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

This state is the residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of this state to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and must be so recognized under section 14-12.2-10 establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

In a proceeding to modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this state.

On issuance of an order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child support order issued in another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Without regard to the restrictions on modification of a child support order stated in subsection 2 of section 14-12.2-04 and this section, a tribunal of this state retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of this state if:

One party resides in another state; and

The other party resides outside the United States.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 13; 2009, ch. 152, § 51.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-46. (612)
Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state:

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 14; 2009, ch. 152, § 52.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-46.1. (613)
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of sections 14-12.2-01 through 14-12.2-12, sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-46.4, and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Sections 14-12.2-13 through 14-12.2-34 and sections 14-12.2-47, 14-12.2-48, and 14-12.2-49 do not apply.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 15; 2009, ch. 152, § 53.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-46.2. (614)
Notice to issuing tribunal of modification.

Within thirty days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 152, § 15.

14-12.2-46.3. (615)
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country or political subdivision.

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-12.2-47.11, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether or not the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to section 14-12.2-45 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 54.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-46.4. (616)
Procedure to register child support order of foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child support order not subject to the convention may register that order in this state as provided in sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-42 if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The petition must specify the grounds for modification.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 55.

14-12.2-47. (701)
Proceeding to determine parentage. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 16; repealed by 2009, ch. 152, § 71, effective July 1, 2015.

14-12.2-47.1. (701)
Definitions.

In sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13:

“Application” means a request under the convention by an obligee, obligor, or on behalf of a child, made through a central authority for assistance from another central authority.

“Central authority” means the entity designated by the United States or a foreign country described in subdivision d of subsection 5 of section 14-12.2-01 to perform the functions specified in the convention.

“Convention support order” means a support order of a tribunal of a foreign country described in subdivision d of subsection 5 of section 14-12.2-01.

“Direct request” means a petition filed by an individual in a tribunal of this state in a proceeding involving an obligee, obligor, or child residing outside the United States.

“Foreign central authority” means the entity designated by a foreign country described in subdivision d of subsection 5 of section 14-12.2-01 to perform the functions specified in the convention.

“Foreign support agreement”:

Means an agreement for support in a record that:

Is enforceable as a support order in the country of origin;

Has been:

Formally drawn up or registered as an authentic instrument by a foreign tribunal; or

Authenticated by, or concluded, registered, or filed with a foreign tribunal; and

May be reviewed and modified by a foreign tribunal; and

Includes a maintenance arrangement or authentic instrument under the convention.

“United States central authority” means the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 56; 2015, ch. 62, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.2. (702)
Applicability.

Sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 apply only to a support proceeding under the convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 is inconsistent with a provision of sections 14-12.2-01 through 14-12.2-46.4, sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 control.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 57; 2015, ch. 62, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.3. (703)
Relationship of department of human services to United States central authority. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services of this state is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the convention.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 58.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.3. (703)
Relationship of department of health and human services to United States central authority. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services of this state is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the convention.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 58; 2021, ch. 352, § 43, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-47.4. (704)
Initiation by department of human services of support proceeding under convention. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In a support proceeding under the convention, the department of human services of this state shall:

Transmit and receive applications; and

Initiate or facilitate the institution of a proceeding regarding an application in a tribunal of this state.

The following support proceedings are available to an obligee under the convention:

Recognition or recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order;

Enforcement of a support order issued or recognized in this state;

Establishment of a support order if there is no existing order, including, where necessary, determination of parentage of a child;

Establishment of a support order if recognition of a foreign support order is refused under subdivision b, d, or i of subsection 2 of section 14-12.2-47.8;

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or foreign country.

The following support proceedings are available under the convention to an obligor against whom there is an existing support order:

Recognition of an order suspending or limiting enforcement of an existing support order of a tribunal of this state;

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or foreign country.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 59; 2015, ch. 62, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.4. (704)
Initiation by department of health and human services of support proceeding under convention. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In a support proceeding under the convention, the department of health and human services of this state shall:

Transmit and receive applications; and

Initiate or facilitate the institution of a proceeding regarding an application in a tribunal of this state.

The following support proceedings are available to an obligee under the convention:

Recognition or recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order;

Enforcement of a support order issued or recognized in this state;

Establishment of a support order if there is no existing order, including, where necessary, determination of parentage of a child;

Establishment of a support order if recognition of a foreign support order is refused under subdivision b, d, or i of subsection 2 of section 14-12.2-47.8;

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or foreign country.

The following support proceedings are available under the convention to an obligor against whom there is an existing support order:

Recognition of an order suspending or limiting enforcement of an existing support order of a tribunal of this state;

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or foreign country.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 59; 2015, ch. 62, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 44, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-47.5. (705)
Direct request. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking the establishment or modification of a support order or determination of parentage of a child. In such a proceeding, the law of this state applies.

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking the recognition and enforcement of a support order or support agreement. In such a proceeding, the provisions of sections 14-12.2-47.6 through 14-12.2-47.13 apply.

In a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a convention support order or foreign support agreement:

A security, bond, or deposit is not required to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses; and

The obligee or obligor, who in the issuing country has benefited from free legal assistance, shall be entitled to benefit, at least to the same extent, from any free legal assistance provided for by the law of this state under the same circumstances.

An individual filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the department of human services.

Nothing in sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 prevents the application of laws of this state that provide simplified, more expeditious rules regarding a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order or support agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 60; 2015, ch. 62, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.5. (705)
Direct request. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking the establishment or modification of a support order or determination of parentage of a child. In such a proceeding, the law of this state applies.

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking the recognition and enforcement of a support order or support agreement. In such a proceeding, the provisions of sections 14-12.2-47.6 through 14-12.2-47.13 apply.

In a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a convention support order or foreign support agreement:

A security, bond, or deposit is not required to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses; and

The obligee or obligor, who in the issuing country has benefited from free legal assistance, shall be entitled to benefit, at least to the same extent, from any free legal assistance provided for by the law of this state under the same circumstances.

An individual filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the department of health and human services.

Nothing in sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 prevents the application of laws of this state that provide simplified, more expeditious rules regarding a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order or support agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 60; 2015, ch. 62, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 45, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-47.6.(706)
Registration of convention support order.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13, a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency seeking recognition of a convention support order shall register the order in this state as provided in sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-46.4.

Notwithstanding section 14-12.2-23 and subsection 1 of section 14-12.2-36, a request for registration of a convention support order must be accompanied by:

A complete text of the support order, or an abstract or extract of the support order drawn up by the issuing foreign tribunal, which may be in the form recommended by the Hague conference on private international law;

A record stating that the support order is enforceable in the issuing country;

If the respondent did not appear and was not represented in the proceedings in the issuing country, a record attesting, as appropriate, either that the respondent had proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard or that the respondent had proper notice of the support order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact or law before a tribunal;

A record showing the amount of arrears, if any, and the date the amount was calculated;

A record showing a requirement for automatic adjustment of the amount of support, if any, and the information necessary to make the appropriate calculations; and

If necessary, a record showing the extent to which the applicant received free legal assistance in the issuing country.

A request for registration of a convention support order may seek recognition and partial enforcement of the order.

A tribunal of this state may vacate the registration of a convention support order without the filing of a contest under section 14-12.2-47.7 only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement of the order would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

The tribunal shall promptly notify the parties of the registration or the order vacating the registration of a convention support order.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 61; 2015, ch. 62, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.7. (707)
Contest of registered convention support order.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13, sections 14-12.2-39 through 14-12.2-42 apply to a contest of a registered convention support order.

A party contesting a registered convention support order must file a contest not later than thirty days after notice of the registration but if the contesting party does not reside in the United States, the contest must be filed not later than sixty days after notice of the registration.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the registered convention support order by the time specified in subsection 2, the order is enforceable.

A contest of a registered convention support order may be based only on grounds set forth in section 14-12.2-47.8, and the contesting party bears the burden of proof.

In a contest of a registered convention support order, a tribunal of this state:

Is bound by the findings of fact on which the foreign tribunal based its jurisdiction; and

May not review the merits of the support order.

A tribunal of this state deciding a contest of a registered convention support order shall promptly notify the parties of its decision.

A challenge or appeal, if any, does not stay the enforcement of a convention support order unless there are exceptional circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 62; 2015, ch. 62, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.8. (708)
Recognition and enforcement of registered convention support order. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a registered convention support order.

The following grounds are the only grounds on which a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of a registered convention support order:

Recognition and enforcement of the order is manifestly incompatible with public policy, including the failure of the issuing tribunal to observe minimum standards of due process, which include notice and an opportunity to be heard;

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction consistent with section 14-12.2-04;

The order is not enforceable in the issuing country;

The order was obtained by fraud in connection with a matter of procedure;

A record transmitted in accordance with section 14-12.2-47.6 lacks authenticity or integrity;

A proceeding between the same parties and having the same purpose is pending before a tribunal of this state and that proceeding was the first to be filed;

The order is incompatible with a more recent support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose if the more recent support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement in this state;

Payment, to the extent alleged arrears have been paid in whole or in part;

In a case in which the respondent neither appeared nor was represented in the proceeding in the issuing foreign country when the law of that country:

Provides for prior notice of proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard; or

Does not provide for prior notice of the proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact or law before a tribunal; or

The order was made in violation of section 14-12.2-47.11.

If a tribunal of this state does not recognize a convention support order under subdivision b, d, or i of subsection 2:

The tribunal may not dismiss the proceeding without allowing a reasonable time for a party to request the establishment of a new convention support order; and

The department of human services shall take all appropriate measures to request a child support order for the obligee if the application for recognition and enforcement was received under section 14-12.2-47.4.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 63; 2015, ch. 62, § 7, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.8. (708)
Recognition and enforcement of registered convention support order. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a registered convention support order.

The following grounds are the only grounds on which a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of a registered convention support order:

Recognition and enforcement of the order is manifestly incompatible with public policy, including the failure of the issuing tribunal to observe minimum standards of due process, which include notice and an opportunity to be heard;

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction consistent with section 14-12.2-04;

The order is not enforceable in the issuing country;

The order was obtained by fraud in connection with a matter of procedure;

A record transmitted in accordance with section 14-12.2-47.6 lacks authenticity or integrity;

A proceeding between the same parties and having the same purpose is pending before a tribunal of this state and that proceeding was the first to be filed;

The order is incompatible with a more recent support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose if the more recent support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement in this state;

Payment, to the extent alleged arrears have been paid in whole or in part;

In a case in which the respondent neither appeared nor was represented in the proceeding in the issuing foreign country when the law of that country:

Provides for prior notice of proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard; or

Does not provide for prior notice of the proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact or law before a tribunal; or

The order was made in violation of section 14-12.2-47.11.

If a tribunal of this state does not recognize a convention support order under subdivision b, d, or i of subsection 2:

The tribunal may not dismiss the proceeding without allowing a reasonable time for a party to request the establishment of a new convention support order; and

The department of health and human services shall take all appropriate measures to request a child support order for the obligee if the application for recognition and enforcement was received under section 14-12.2-47.4.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 63; 2015, ch. 62, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 46, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-47.9. (709)
Partial enforcement.

If a tribunal of this state does not recognize and enforce a convention support order in its entirety, it shall enforce any severable part of the order. An application or direct request may seek recognition and partial enforcement of a convention support order.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 64; 2015, ch. 62, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.10. (710)
Foreign support agreement.

Except as provided in subsections 3 and 4, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a foreign support agreement registered in this state.

An application or direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement shall be accompanied by:

A complete text of the foreign support agreement; and

A record stating that the foreign support agreement is enforceable as an order of support in the issuing country.

A tribunal of this state may vacate the registration of a foreign support agreement only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

In a contest of a foreign support agreement, a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of the agreement if it finds:

Recognition and enforcement of the agreement is manifestly incompatible with public policy;

The agreement was obtained by fraud or falsification;

The agreement is incompatible with a support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose in this state, another state, or a foreign country if the support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this chapter in this state; or

The record submitted under subsection 2 lacks authenticity or integrity.

A proceeding for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement shall be suspended during the pendency of a challenge to or appeal of the agreement before a tribunal of another state or foreign country.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 65; 2015, ch. 62, § 9, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.11. (711)
Modification of convention child support order.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a convention child support order if the obligee remains a resident of the foreign country where the support order was issued unless:

The obligee submits to the jurisdiction of a tribunal of this state, either expressly or by defending on the merits of the case without objecting to the jurisdiction at the first available opportunity; or

The foreign tribunal lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its support order or issue a new support order.

If a tribunal of this state does not modify a convention child support order because the order is not recognized in this state, subsection 3 of section 14-12.2-47.8 applies.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 66; 2015, ch. 62, § 10, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.12. (712)
Personal information — Limit on use.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 67.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-47.13. (713)
Record in original language — English translation required.

A record filed with a tribunal of this state under sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 must be in the original language and, if not in English, must be accompanied by an English translation.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 68; 2015, ch. 62, § 11, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-48. (801)
Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of sections 14-12.2-48 and 14-12.2-49, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this chapter.

The governor of this state may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 69.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-49. (802)
Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least sixty days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this chapter or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 70.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”